apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <pardef n="valami__prn">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->
    <pardef n="két__num">
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->


    <!-- regular a o u -->
    <pardef n="ház__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>at</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>zal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="szem__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>mel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ük</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="bab__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ot</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="banán__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ajt/ó__n">
        <e><p><l>ó</l><r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ót</l><r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ónak</l><r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>óval</l><r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>óban</l><r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>óhoz</l><r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>óba</l><r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ónál</l><r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ón</l><r>ó<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>aja</l><r>ó<s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ónk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajuk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="adó__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>val</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r>ó<s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="asztal__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>lal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="alkohol__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>lal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="semmi"><i>semmi</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="valami"><i>valami</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="két"><i>két</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ágyú"><i>ágyú</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajtó"><i>ajt</i><par n="ajt/ó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akció"><i>akció</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alkohol"><i>alkohol</i><par n="alkohol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="altatódal"><i>altatódal</i><par n="asztal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="angyal"><i>angyal</i><par n="asztal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ápoló"><i>ápoló</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áru"><i>áru</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áruló"><i>áruló</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ásó"><i>ásó</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asztal"><i>asztal</i><par n="asztal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autó"><i>autó</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bab"><i>bab</i><par n="bab__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bábu"><i>bábu</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bál"><i>bál</i><par n="alkohol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="banán"><i>banán</i><par n="banán__n"/></e>
    <e lm="báró"><i>báró</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bemondó"><i>bemondó</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bemutató"><i>bemutató</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="besúgó"><i>besúgó</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="betegszállító"><i>betegszállító</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beugró"><i>beugró</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beutaló"><i>beutaló</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bevándorló"><i>bevándorló</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biztosító"><i>biztosító</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bob"><i>bob</i><par n="bab__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bolygó"><i>bolygó</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="borjú"><i>borjú</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="borsó"><i>borsó</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bú"><i>bú</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cél"><i>cél</i><par n="alkohol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csacsi"><i>csacsi</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csalán"><i>csalán</i><par n="banán__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csapóajtó"><i>csapóajt</i><par n="ajt/ó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cselló"><i>cselló</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csipkebogyó"><i>csipkebogyó</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csukló"><i>csukló</i><par n="adó__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ház"><i>ház</i><par n="ház__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asszisztens"><p><l>asszisztens</l><r>asszisztens</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="békaszem"><p><l>békaszem</l><r>békaszem</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="billér"><p><l>billér</l><r>billér</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cseres-tölgyes"><p><l>cseres-tölgyes</l><r>cseres-tölgyes</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dugpénz"><p><l>dugpénz</l><r>dugpénz</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elegy"><p><l>elegy</l><r>elegy</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elnyerés"><p><l>elnyerés</l><r>elnyerés</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="énekes"><p><l>énekes</l><r>énekes</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="exponens"><p><l>exponens</l><r>exponens</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fellépés"><p><l>fellépés</l><r>fellépés</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fitestvér"><p><l>fitestvér</l><r>fitestvér</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gerely"><p><l>gerely</l><r>gerely</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="házasélet"><p><l>házasélet</l><r>házasélet</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="igény"><p><l>igény</l><r>igény</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kereslet"><p><l>kereslet</l><r>kereslet</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kisközség"><p><l>kisközség</l><r>kisközség</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kövezet"><p><l>kövezet</l><r>kövezet</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="magánjelenet"><p><l>magánjelenet</l><r>magánjelenet</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="megtérés"><p><l>megtérés</l><r>megtérés</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nehézség"><p><l>nehézség</l><r>nehézség</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pincészet"><p><l>pincészet</l><r>pincészet</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="révület"><p><l>révület</l><r>révület</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="személy"><p><l>személy</l><r>személy</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="táramérleg"><p><l>táramérleg</l><r>táramérleg</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tünet"><p><l>tünet</l><r>tünet</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
    <e lm="volumen"><p><l>volumen</l><r>volumen</r></p><par n="szem__n"/></e>
